Utah statutes.
53-5-710.   Cross-references to concealed firearm permit restrictions.
A person with a permit to carry a concealed firearm may not carry a concealed
firearm in the following locations:
(1)  any secure area prescribed in Section 76-10-523.5 in which firearms are
prohibited and notice of the prohibition posted;
(2)  in any airport secure area as provided in Section 76-10-529; or
(3)  in any house of worship or in any private residence where dangerous
weapons are prohibited as provided in Section 76-10-530.
